Washington statutes.
RCW 43.10.050

Authority to execute appeal and other bonds.

The attorney general may execute, on behalf of the state, any appeal or other bond required to be given by the state in any judicial proceeding to which it is a party in any court, and procure sureties thereon.

[ 1965 c 8 s 43.10.050. Prior: 1929 c 92 s 6; RRS s 11034; prior: 1905 c 99 s 1.]